Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BUS RAPID TRANSIT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $75,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Metropolitan Council for real property acquisition, predesign, design, engineering, and construction of arterial bus rapid transit, including utility relocation, demolition, and furnishing and equipping facilities for arterial bus rapid transit projects. The council must allocate the money among projects based on criteria in the council's transitway capital improvement plan, including consistency with the council's transportation policy plan; project readiness; potential current and forecasted ridership; expansion of the bus rapid transit system; availability of federal or other matching funding; coordination with other major projects; and additional criteria for priorities otherwise specified in state law or rule applicable to bus rapid transit, including state law authorizing state bond fund appropriations for a bus rapid transit project. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $75,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end